Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.180

Legislative approval—Uniform benefits package and medical risk adjustment mechanisms.

The legislature may disapprove of the uniform benefits package developed under *RCW 43.72.130 and medical risk adjustment mechanisms developed under **RCW 43.72.040(7) by an act of law at any time prior to the last day of the following regular legislative session. If such disapproval action is taken, the commission shall resubmit a modified package to the legislature within fifteen days of the disapproval. If the legislature does not disapprove or modify the package by an act of law by the end of that regular session, the package is deemed approved.

[ 1995 c 2 s 2; 1993 c 492 s 454.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.72.130 was repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27, effective July 1, 1995.

**(2) RCW 43.72.040 was repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27, effective July 1, 1995.

(3) RCW 43.72.180 was also repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27 without cognizance of its amendment by 1995 c 2 s 2. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—1995 c 2: See note following RCW 43.72.090.

PDFRCW 43.72.180

Legislative approval—Uniform benefits package and medical risk adjustment mechanisms.

[ 1993 c 492 s 454.]
Repealed by 1995 c 265 s 27, effective July 1, 1995.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 43.72.180 was also amended by 1995 c 2 s 2 without cognizance of its repeal by 1995 c 265 s 27. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.